California statutes. Public Resources Code
All public agencies shall adopt by ordinance, resolution, rule, or regulation, objectives, criteria, and procedures for the evaluation of projects and the preparation of environmental impact reports and negative declarations pursuant to this division. A school district, or any other district, whose boundaries are coterminous with a city, county, or city and county, may utilize the objectives, criteria, and procedures of the city, county, or city and county, as may be applicable, in which case, the school district or other district need not adopt objectives, criteria, and procedures of its own. The objectives, criteria, and procedures shall be consistent with the provisions of this division and with the guidelines adopted by the Secretary of the Resources Agency pursuant to Section 21083. Such objectives, criteria, and procedures shall be adopted by each public agency no later than 60 days after the Secretary of the Resources Agency has adopted guidelines pursuant to Section 21083.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1312.)
-------------------------------------------

21082.1.

(a) A draft environmental impact report, environmental impact report, negative declaration, or mitigated negative declaration prepared pursuant to the requirements of this division shall be prepared directly by, or under contract to, a public agency.

(b) This section does not prohibit, and shall not be construed as prohibiting, a person from submitting information or other comments to the public agency responsible for preparing an environmental impact report, draft environmental impact report, negative declaration, or mitigated negative declaration. The information or other comments may be submitted in any format, shall be considered by the public agency, and may be included, in whole or in part, in any report or declaration.

(c) The lead agency shall do all of the following:

(1) Independently review and analyze any report or declaration required by this division.

(2) Circulate draft documents that reflect its independent judgment.

(3) As part of the adoption of a negative declaration or a mitigated negative declaration, or certification of an environmental impact report, find that the report or declaration reflects the independent judgment of the lead agency.

(4) Submit, in an electronic form as required by the Office of Planning and Research, the draft environmental impact report, proposed negative declaration, or proposed mitigated negative declaration to the State Clearinghouse.

(d) The lead agency shall post all environmental review documents described in subdivision (a) on its internet website, if any.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 97, Sec. 2.   (AB 819)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

21082.2.

(a) The lead agency shall determine whether a project may have a significant effect on the environment based on substantial evidence in light of the whole record.

(b) The existence of public controversy over the environmental effects of a project shall not require preparation of an environmental impact report if there is no substantial evidence in light of the whole record before the lead agency that the project may have a significant effect on the environment.

(c) Argument, speculation, unsubstantiated opinion or narrative, evidence which is clearly inaccurate or erroneous, or evidence of social or economic impacts which do not contribute to, or are not caused by, physical impacts on the environment, is not substantial evidence. Substantial evidence shall include facts, reasonable assumptions predicated upon facts, and expert opinion supported by facts.

(d) If there is substantial evidence, in light of the whole record before the lead agency, that a project may have a significant effect on the environment, an environmental impact report shall be prepared.

(e) Statements in an environmental impact report and comments with respect to an environmental impact report shall not be deemed determinative of whether the project may have a significant effect on the environment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1131, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21082.3.

(a) Any mitigation measures agreed upon in the consultation conducted pursuant to Section 21080.3.2 shall be recommended for inclusion in the environmental document and in an adopted mitigation monitoring and reporting program, if determined to avoid or lessen the impact pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), and shall be fully enforceable.

(b) If a project may have a significant impact on a tribal cultural resource, the lead agency’s environmental document shall discuss both of the following:

(1) Whether the proposed project has a significant impact on an identified tribal cultural resource.

(2) Whether feasible alternatives or mitigation measures, including those measures that may be agreed to pursuant to subdivision (a), avoid or substantially lessen the impact on the identified tribal cultural resource.

(c) (1) Any information, including, but not limited to, the location, description, and use of the tribal cultural resources, that is submitted by a California Native American tribe during the environmental review process shall not be included in the environmental document or otherwise disclosed by the lead agency or any other public agency to the public, consistent with Sections 7927.000 and 7927.005 of the Government Code, and subdivision (d) of Section 15120 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, without the prior consent of the
 tribe that provided the information. If the lead agency publishes any information submitted by a California Native American tribe during the consultation or environmental review process, that information
 shall be published in a confidential appendix to the environmental document unless the tribe that provided the information consents, in writing, to the disclosure of some or all of the information to the public. This subdivision does not prohibit the confidential exchange of the submitted information between public agencies that have lawful jurisdiction over the preparation of the environmental document.

(2) (A) This subdivision does not prohibit the confidential exchange of information regarding tribal cultural resources submitted by a California Native American tribe during the consultation or environmental review process among the lead agency, the California Native American tribe, the project applicant, or the project applicant’s agent. Except as provided in subparagraph (B) or unless the California
 Native American tribe providing the information consents, in writing, to public disclosure, the project applicant or the project applicant’s legal advisers, using a reasonable degree of care, shall maintain the confidentiality of the information exchanged for the purposes of preventing looting, vandalism, or damage to tribal cultural resources and shall not disclose to a third party confidential information regarding tribal cultural resources.

(B) This paragraph does not apply to data or information that are or become publicly available, are already in the lawful possession of the project applicant before the provision of the information by the California Native American tribe, are independently developed by the project applicant or the project applicant’s agents, or are lawfully obtained by the project applicant from a third party
 that is not the lead agency, a California Native American tribe, or another public agency.

(3) This subdivision does not affect or alter the application of Section 7927.000 or 7927.005 of the Government Code, or subdivision (d) of Section 15120 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(4) This subdivision does not prevent a lead agency or other public agency from describing the information in general terms in the environmental document so as to inform the public of the basis of the lead agency’s or other public agency’s decision without breaching the confidentiality required by this subdivision.

(d) In addition to other provisions of this division, the lead agency may certify an environmental impact report or
 adopt a mitigated negative declaration for a project with a significant impact on an identified tribal cultural resource only if one of the following occurs:

(1) The consultation process between the California Native American tribe and the lead agency has occurred as provided in Sections 21080.3.1 and 21080.3.2 and concluded pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 21080.3.2.

(2) The California Native American tribe has requested consultation pursuant to Section 21080.3.1 and has failed to provide comments to the lead agency, or otherwise failed to engage, in the consultation process.

(3) The lead agency has complied with subdivision (d) of Section 21080.3.1 and the California Native American tribe has failed to request
 consultation within 30 days.

(e) If the mitigation measures recommended by the staff of the lead agency as a result of the consultation process are not included in the environmental document or if there are no agreed upon mitigation measures at the conclusion of the consultation or if consultation does not occur, and if substantial evidence demonstrates that a project will cause a significant effect to a tribal cultural resource, the lead agency shall consider feasible mitigation pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 21084.3.

(f) Consistent with subdivision (c), the lead agency shall publish confidential information obtained from a California Native American tribe during the consultation process in a confidential appendix to the environmental document and shall include a general
 description of the information, as provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) in the environmental document for public review during the public comment period provided pursuant to this division.

(g) This section is not intended, and may not be construed, to limit consultation between the state and tribal governments, existing confidentiality provisions, or the protection of religious exercise to the fullest extent permitted under state and federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 378.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

21082.4.

In describing and evaluating a project in an environmental review document prepared pursuant to this division, the lead agency may consider specific economic, legal, social, technological, or other benefits, including regionwide or statewide environmental benefits, of a proposed project and the negative impacts of denying the project. Any benefits or negative impacts considered pursuant to this section shall be based on
 substantial evidence in light of the whole record.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 193, Sec. 1.   (AB 2782)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

21083.

(a) The Office of Planning and Research shall prepare and develop proposed guidelines for the implementation of this division by public agencies. The guidelines shall include objectives and criteria for the orderly evaluation of projects and the preparation of environmental impact reports and negative declarations in a manner consistent with this division.

(b) The guidelines shall specifically include criteria for public agencies to follow in determining whether or not a proposed project may have a “significant effect on the environment.” The criteria shall require a finding that a project may have a “significant effect on the environment” if one or more of the following conditions exist:

(1) A proposed project has the potential to degrade the quality of the environment, curtail the range of the environment, or to achieve short-term, to the disadvantage of long-term, environmental goals.

(2) The possible effects of a project are individually limited but cumulatively considerable. As used in this paragraph, “cumulatively considerable” means that the incremental effects of an individual project are considerable when viewed in connection with the effects of past projects, the effects of other current projects, and the effects of probable future projects.

(3) The environmental effects of a project will cause substantial adverse effects on human beings, either directly or indirectly.

(c) The guidelines shall include procedures for determining the lead agency pursuant to Section 21165.

(d) The guidelines shall include criteria for public agencies to use in determining when a proposed project is of sufficient statewide, regional, or areawide environmental significance that a draft environmental impact report, a proposed negative declaration, or a proposed mitigated negative declaration shall be submitted to appropriate state agencies, through the State Clearinghouse, for review and comment prior to completion of the environmental impact report, negative declaration, or mitigated negative declaration.

(e) The Office of Planning and Research shall develop and prepare the proposed guidelines as soon as possible and shall transmit them immediately to the Secretary of the Resources Agency. The Secretary of the Resources Agency shall certify and adopt the guidelines pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, which shall become effective upon the filing thereof. However, the guidelines shall not be adopted without compliance with Sections 11346.4, 11346.5, and 11346.8 of the Government Code.

(f)The Office of Planning and Research shall, at least once every two years, review the guidelines adopted pursuant to this section and shall recommend proposed changes or amendments to the Secretary of the Resources Agency. The Secretary of the Resources Agency shall certify and adopt guidelines, and any amendments thereto, at least once every two years, pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, which shall become effective upon the filing thereof. However, guidelines may not be adopted or amended without compliance with Sections 11346.4, 11346.5, and 11346.8 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 689, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

21083.01.

(a) On or after January 1, 2013, at the time of the next review of the guidelines prepared and developed to implement this division pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 21083, the Office of Planning and Research, in cooperation with the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, shall prepare, develop, and transmit to the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency recommended proposed changes or amendments to the initial study checklist of the guidelines implementing this division for the inclusion of questions related to fire hazard impacts for projects located on lands classified as state responsibility areas, as defined in Section 4102, and on lands classified as very high fire hazard severity zones, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 51177 of the
 Government Code.

(b) Upon receipt and review, the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall certify and adopt the recommended proposed changes or amendments prepared and developed by the Office of Planning and Research pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 311, Sec. 5.   (SB 1241)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

21083.03.

(a) (1) On or before July 1, 2027, the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation shall map the eligible urban infill sites within every urbanized area or urban cluster in the state.

(2) The Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation shall develop a definition of and metrics for identifying “eligible urban infill sites” that reflect both of the following criteria:

(A) (i) The site has a land use designation that is consistent with infill development as set forth in the local jurisdiction’s most recent general plan or most recently adopted housing element that has been certified by the Department of Housing and
 Community Development to be in compliance with state law.

(ii) If a local jurisdiction has submitted land use designation information to the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation in accordance with paragraph (3), the determination of the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation on whether a site within that jurisdiction has a land use designation that is consistent with infill development is based on the information provided by the local jurisdiction.

(B) Development on the site promotes compact development in order to accomplish one or more of the following goals:

(i) Reduce greenhouse gas emissions and improve regional air quality by reducing the distance people need to travel.

(ii) Reduce conversion of agricultural land,
 sensitive habitat, and open space for new development.

(iii) Facilitate healthy and environmentally friendly active transportation.

(iv) Reduce stormwater runoff resulting in flooding and pollution of waterways.

(v) Bring vibrancy, community, and social connection to neighborhoods.

(3) (A) (i) At least 120 days before initial adoption of a map of eligible urban infill sites under this subdivision, the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation shall transmit a copy of the draft map or revision to the board of supervisors of each county and to the city council of each city in which any portion of the mapped area is
 located.

(ii) Within 45 days after receiving the draft map under subparagraph (A), the city, county, or city and county may submit comments and proposed corrections to the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation. The Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation shall consider any comments and proposed corrections submitted by the city, county, or city and county, and revise the draft map as appropriate. The city, county, or city and county may include a map of current land use designations within its boundaries and the zoning districts and regulations associated with each designation.

(iii) After making any revisions pursuant to clause (ii), the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation shall, before adoption, publish the draft map on its internet website for at least 45 days, conduct at least one public meeting to present the draft
 map, and receive public comments.

(iv) The Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation shall consider any comments received at the public meeting held, or in writing during the 45-day public comment period, pursuant to clause (iii) when preparing the final map. The Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation shall publish the final map on its internet website and shall transmit a copy to the board of supervisors of each county and to the city council of each city in which any portion of the mapped area is located.

(B) (i) The Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation may amend any portion of the map of eligible urban infill sites from time to time based upon a land use designation change or other change in circumstances.

(ii) At least 45 days before
 amending the map, the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation shall transmit a copy of the draft amendment to the board of supervisors of each county and to the city council of each city affected by the proposed amendment. The local jurisdiction may submit comments and proposed corrections to the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation that the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation shall consider, along with any other land use designation information provided by the local jurisdiction, as the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation revises the draft amendment as appropriate.

(4) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the adoption or amendment of a map of eligible urban infill sites or to the development of definitions and metrics under this subdivision.

(b) For
 purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Urbanized area” means an urbanized area designated by the United States Census Bureau, as published in the Federal Register, Volume 77, Number 59, on March 27, 2012.

(2) “Urban cluster” means an urban cluster designated by the United States Census Bureau, as published in the Federal Register, Volume 77, Number 59, on March 27, 2012.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 24, Sec. 17.   (SB 131)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21083.05.

The Office of Planning and Research and the Natural Resources Agency shall periodically update the guidelines for the mitigation of greenhouse gas emissions or the effects of greenhouse gas emissions as required by this division, including, but not limited to, effects associated with transportation or energy consumption, to incorporate new information or criteria established by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 548, Sec. 5.   (AB 2669)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

21083.09.

On or before July 1, 2016, the Office of Planning and Research shall prepare and develop, and the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall certify and adopt, revisions to the guidelines that update Appendix G of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 15000) of Division 6 of Title 4 of the California Code of Regulations to do both of the following:

(a) Separate the consideration of paleontological resources from tribal cultural resources and update the relevant sample questions.

(b) Add consideration of tribal cultural resources with relevant sample questions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 532, Sec. 8.   (AB 52)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

21083.1.

It is the intent of the Legislature that courts, consistent with generally accepted rules of statutory interpretation, shall not interpret this division or the state guidelines adopted pursuant to Section 21083 in a manner which imposes procedural or substantive requirements beyond those explicitly stated in this division or in the state guidelines.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1070, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21083.2.

(a) As part of the determination made pursuant to Section 21080.1, the lead agency shall determine whether the project may have a significant effect on archaeological resources. If the lead agency determines that the project may have a significant effect on unique archaeological resources, the environmental impact report shall address the issue of those resources. An environmental impact report, if otherwise necessary, shall not address the issue of nonunique archaeological resources. A negative declaration shall be issued with respect to a project if, but for the issue of nonunique archaeological resources, the negative declaration would be otherwise issued.

(b) If it can be demonstrated that a project will cause damage to a unique archaeological resource, the lead agency may require reasonable efforts to be made to permit any or all of these resources to be preserved in place or left in an undisturbed state. Examples of that treatment, in no order of preference, may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Planning construction to avoid archaeological sites.

(2) Deeding archaeological sites into permanent conservation easements.

(3) Capping or covering archaeological sites with a layer of soil before building on the sites.

(4) Planning parks, greenspace, or other open space to incorporate archaeological sites.

(c) To the extent that unique archaeological resources are not preserved in place or not left in an undisturbed state, mitigation measures shall be required as provided in this subdivision. The project applicant shall provide a guarantee to the lead agency to pay one-half the estimated cost of mitigating the significant effects of the project on unique archaeological resources. In determining payment, the lead agency shall give due consideration to the in-kind value of project design or expenditures that are intended to permit any or all archaeological resources or California Native American culturally significant sites to be preserved in place or left in an undisturbed state. When a final decision is made to carry out or approve the project, the lead agency shall, if necessary, reduce the specified mitigation measures to those which can be funded with the money guaranteed by the project applicant plus the money voluntarily guaranteed by any other person or persons for those mitigation purposes. In order to allow time for interested persons to provide the funding guarantee referred to in this subdivision, a final decision to carry out or approve a project shall not occur sooner than 60 days after completion of the recommended special environmental impact report required by this section.

(d) Excavation as mitigation shall be restricted to those parts of the unique archaeological resource that would be damaged or destroyed by the project. Excavation as mitigation shall not be required for a unique archaeological resource if the lead agency determines that testing or studies already completed have adequately recovered the scientifically consequential information from and about the resource, if this determination is documented in the environmental impact report.

(e) In no event shall the amount paid by a project applicant for mitigation measures required pursuant to subdivision (c) exceed the following amounts:

(1) An amount equal to one-half of 1 percent of the projected cost of the project for mitigation measures undertaken within the site boundaries of a commercial or industrial project.

(2) An amount equal to three-fourths of 1 percent of the projected cost of the project for mitigation measures undertaken within the site boundaries of a housing project consisting of a single unit.

(3) If a housing project consists of more than a single unit, an amount equal to three-fourths of 1 percent of the projected cost of the project for mitigation measures undertaken within the site boundaries of the project for the first unit plus the sum of the following:

(A) Two hundred dollars ($200) per unit for any of the next 99 units.

(B) One hundred fifty dollars ($150) per unit for any of the next 400 units. 

(C) One hundred dollars ($100) per unit in excess of 500 units.

(f) Unless special or unusual circumstances warrant an exception, the field excavation phase of an approved mitigation plan shall be completed within 90 days after final approval necessary to implement the physical development of the project or, if a phased project, in connection with the phased portion to which the specific mitigation measures are applicable. However, the project applicant may extend that period if he or she so elects. Nothing in this section shall nullify protections for Indian cemeteries under any other provision of law.

(g) As used in this section, “unique archaeological resource” means an archaeological artifact, object, or site about which it can be clearly demonstrated that, without merely adding to the current body of knowledge, there is a high probability that it meets any of the following criteria:

(1) Contains information needed to answer important scientific research questions and that there is a demonstrable public interest in that information.

(2) Has a special and particular quality such as being the oldest of its type or the best available example of its type.

(3) Is directly associated with a scientifically recognized important prehistoric or historic event or person.

(h) As used in this section, “nonunique archaeological resource” means an archaeological artifact, object, or site which does not meet the criteria in subdivision (g). A nonunique archaeological resource need be given no further consideration, other than the simple recording of its existence by the lead agency if it so elects.

(i) As part of the objectives, criteria, and procedures required by Section 21082 or as part of conditions imposed for mitigation, a lead agency may make provisions for archaeological sites accidentally discovered during construction. These provisions may include an immediate evaluation of the find. If the find is determined to be a unique archaeological resource, contingency funding and a time allotment sufficient to allow recovering an archaeological sample or to employ one of the avoidance measures may be required under the provisions set forth in this section. Construction work may continue on other parts of the building site while archaeological mitigation takes place.

(j) This section does not apply to any project described in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 21065 if the lead agency elects to comply with all other applicable provisions of this division. This section does not apply to any project described in subdivision (c) of Section 21065 if the applicant and the lead agency jointly elect to comply with all other applicable provisions of this division.

(k) Any additional costs to any local agency as a result of complying with this section with respect to a project of other than a public agency shall be borne by the project applicant.

(l) Nothing in this section is intended to affect or modify the requirements of Section 21084 or 21084.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21083.3.

(a) If a parcel has been zoned to accommodate a particular density of development or has been designated in a community plan to accommodate a particular density of development and an environmental impact report was certified for that zoning or planning action, the application of this division to the approval of any subdivision map or other project that is consistent with the zoning or community plan shall be limited to effects upon the environment which are peculiar to the parcel or to the project and which were not addressed as significant effects in the prior environmental impact report, or which substantial new information shows will be more significant than described in the prior environmental impact report.

(b) If a development project is consistent with the general plan of a local agency and an environmental impact report was certified with respect to that general plan, the application of this division to the approval of that development project shall be limited to effects on the environment which are peculiar to the parcel or to the project and which were not addressed as significant effects in the prior environmental impact report, or which substantial new information shows will be more significant than described in the prior environmental impact report.

(c) Nothing in this section affects any requirement to analyze potentially significant offsite impacts and cumulative impacts of the project not discussed in the prior environmental impact report with respect to the general plan. However, all public agencies with authority to mitigate the significant effects shall undertake or require the undertaking of any feasible mitigation measures specified in the prior environmental impact report relevant to a significant effect which the project will have on the environment or, if not, then the provisions of this section shall have no application to that effect. The lead agency shall make a finding, at a public hearing, as to whether those mitigation measures will be undertaken. 

(d) An effect of a project upon the environment shall not be considered peculiar to the parcel or to the project, for purposes of this section, if uniformly applied development policies or standards have been previously adopted by the city or county, with a finding based upon substantial evidence, which need not include an environmental impact report, that the development policies or standards will substantially mitigate that environmental effect when applied to future projects, unless substantial new information shows that the policies or standards will not substantially mitigate the environmental effect.

(e) Where a community plan is the basis for application of this section, any rezoning action consistent with the community plan shall be a project subject to exemption from this division in accordance with this section. As used in this section, “community plan” means a part of the general plan of a city or county which (1) applies to a defined geographic portion of the total area included in the general plan, (2) complies with Article 5 (commencing with Section 65300) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code by including or referencing each of the mandatory elements specified in Section 65302 of the Government Code, and (3) contains specific development policies adopted for the area included in the community plan and identifies measures to implement those policies, so that the policies which will apply to each parcel can be determined.

(f) No person shall have standing to bring an action or proceeding to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul a finding of a public agency made at a public hearing pursuant to subdivision (a) with respect to the conformity of the project to the mitigation measures identified in the prior environmental impact report for the zoning or planning action, unless he or she has participated in that public hearing. However, this subdivision shall not be applicable if the local agency failed to give public notice of the hearing as required by law. For purposes of this subdivision, a person has participated in the public hearing if he or she has either submitted oral or written testimony regarding the proposed determination, finding, or decision prior to the close of the hearing.

(g) Any community plan adopted prior to January 1, 1982, which does not comply with the definitional criteria specified in subdivision (e) may be amended to comply with that criteria, in which case the plan shall be deemed a “community plan” within the meaning of subdivision (e) if (1) an environmental impact report was certified for adoption of the plan, and (2) at the time of the conforming amendment, the environmental impact report has not been held inadequate by a court of this state and is not the subject of pending litigation challenging its adequacy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

21083.4.

(a) For purposes of this section, “oak” means a native tree species in the genus Quercus, not designated as Group A or Group B commercial species pursuant to regulations adopted by the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection pursuant to Section 4526, and that is 5 inches or more in diameter at breast height.

(b) As part of the determination made pursuant to Section 21080.1, a county shall determine whether a project within its jurisdiction may result in a conversion of oak woodlands that will have a significant effect on the environment. If a county determines that there may be a significant effect to oak woodlands, the county shall require one or more of the following oak woodlands mitigation alternatives to mitigate the significant effect of the conversion of oak woodlands:

(1) Conserve oak woodlands, through the use of conservation easements.

(2) (A) Plant an appropriate number of trees, including maintaining plantings and replacing dead or diseased trees.

(B) The requirement to maintain trees pursuant to this paragraph terminates seven years after the trees are planted.

(C) Mitigation pursuant to this paragraph shall not fulfill more than one-half of the mitigation requirement for the project.

(D) The requirements imposed pursuant to this paragraph also may be used to restore former oak woodlands.

(3) Contribute funds to the Oak Woodlands Conservation Fund, as established under subdivision (a) of Section 1363 of the Fish and Game Code, for the purpose of purchasing oak woodlands conservation easements, as specified under paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of that section and the guidelines and criteria of the Wildlife Conservation Board. A project applicant that contributes funds under this paragraph shall not receive a grant from the Oak Woodlands Conservation Fund as part of the mitigation for the project.

(4)Other mitigation measures developed by the county.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 1363 of the Fish and Game Code, a county may use a grant awarded pursuant to the Oak Woodlands Conservation Act (Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 1360) of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code) to prepare an oak conservation element for a general plan, an oak protection ordinance, or an oak woodlands management plan, or amendments thereto, that meets the requirements of this section.

(d) The following are exempt from this section:

(1) Projects undertaken pursuant to an approved Natural Community Conservation Plan or approved subarea plan within an approved Natural Community Conservation Plan that includes oaks as a covered species or that conserves oak habitat through natural community conservation preserve designation and implementation and mitigation measures that are consistent with this section.

(2) Affordable housing projects for lower income households, as defined pursuant to Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code, that are located within an urbanized area, or within a sphere of influence as defined pursuant to Section 56076 of the Government Code.

(3) Conversion of oak woodlands on agricultural land that includes land that is used to produce or process plant and animal products for commercial purposes.

(4) Projects undertaken pursuant to Section 21080.5 of the Public Resources Code.

(e) (1) A lead agency that adopts, and a project that incorporates, one or more of the measures specified in this section to mitigate the significant effects to oaks and oak woodlands shall be deemed to be in compliance with this division only as it applies to effects on oaks and oak woodlands.

(2) The Legislature does not intend this section to modify requirements of this division, other than with regard to effects on oaks and oak woodlands.

(f) This section does not preclude the application of Section 21081 to a project.

(g) This section, and the regulations adopted pursuant to this section, shall not be construed as a limitation on the power of a public agency to comply with this division or any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 732, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

21083.5.

(a) The guidelines prepared and adopted pursuant to Section 21083 shall provide that, when an environmental impact statement has been, or will be, prepared for the same project pursuant to the requirements of the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 4321 et seq.) and implementing regulations, or an environmental impact report has been, or will be, prepared for the same project pursuant to the requirements of the Tahoe Regional Planning Compact (Section 66801 of the Government Code) and implementing regulations, all or any part of that statement or report may be submitted in lieu of all or any part of an environmental impact report required by this division, if that statement or report, or the part which is used, complies with the requirements of this division and the guidelines adopted pursuant thereto.
